Washington statutes.
RCW 43.52.585

Procedures for implementing RCW 43.52.560 through 43.52.580.

The executive board shall establish procedures for implementing RCW 43.52.560 through 43.52.580 by operating agency resolution after notice, public hearing, and opportunity for public comment. The procedures shall be established within six months after July 26, 1987.

[ 1987 c 376 s 6.]